Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 6. Administration

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

81 C.J.S. Social Security and Public Welfare §§ 209 to 215.

§ 27-3-601.
Unemployment insurance commission created; composition; terms; vacancies; salary; chairman; quorum; removal; office; seal.

The unemployment insurance commission of Wyoming is created within the department of workforce services and shall consist of three (3) members serving a term of six (6) years each. Appointments, vacancies and expiration of terms shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

. A member shall not hold any state office or serve as an officer or on a committee of any political organization during the term of membership. No more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the members shall be of the same political party.

Every two (2) years one (1) member shall be elected by the membership to serve as chairman. Two (2) members is a quorum. A vacancy does not prevent the remaining members from exercising powers of the commission. One (1) member shall not exercise powers if two (2) vacancies occur at the same time.

Commission members shall receive a salary equal to the per diem paid to members of the Wyoming legislature under W.S.

28-5-101

for each day of actual service and when engaged in necessary travel plus necessary expenses.

The governor may remove a commissioner as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The office of the commission shall be located in Casper, Wyoming and the commission shall have an official seal which shall be judicially noticed.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, §§ 10, 11; 1939, ch. 124, § 15; 1941, ch. 96, §§ 9, 10; 1943, ch. 58, § 7; 1945, ch. 81, § 9; C.S. 1945, §§ 54-110, 54-111; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 10, 11; 1953, ch. 118, § 1; 1957, ch. 226, § 4; W.S. 1957, §§ 27-32, 27-33; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 40; 1963, ch. 46, § 2; 1965, ch. 115, § 41; 1967, ch. 71, § 1; ch. 181, § 21; 1969, ch. 168, § 18; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 27-3-112, 27-3-113; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; ch. 141, § 1; 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%) of the” for “two (2)” in the last sentence of (a).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2 states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Stated

in

Scott v. Fagan, 684 P.2d 805,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1984); County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and effect of state laws requiring payment of wages on resignation of employee immediately or within specified period, 11 ALR5th 715.

§ 27-3-602.
Powers and duties of unemployment insurance commission; personnel.

The commission shall:

Adopt rules necessary for the administration of this act by the department of workforce services and the department, in accordance with law, may make expenditures, require reports, make investigations and take other action it considers necessary;

Determine its methods of procedure in accordance with this act;

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 3.

Through the department, and if possible, provide a reserve against fund liability for future benefit payments in excess of contributions in accordance with accepted actuarial principles based on employment, business activity and other relevant factors;

Through the department, recommend to the governor and the legislature a change in contribution or benefit rates when necessary to protect fund solvency;

Define and prescribe by regulation necessary procedures for total unemployment and part total unemployment;

Through the department, publish provisions of this act, rules and regulations, reports and other relevant material and furnish copies in accordance with W.S.

16-4-204

to any person upon application.

The commission may adopt, amend or rescind rules and regulations after notice and public hearing in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§

16-3-101

et seq.].

In administering this act, the commission or any authorized representative of the department may administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, certify official acts, subpoena witnesses and require the production of books, papers or other records material to the administration of this act.

If a subpoena issued to any person pursuant to subsection (c) of this section is disobeyed, the district court of the district in which the inquiry is conducted or the person is found, resides or conducts business shall, upon application by the commission or department, issue to the person refusing to obey the subpoena an order requiring the person to appear before the commission or department to produce evidence if ordered or to give evidence touching the matter in question. Any person failing to obey the court order may be punished by the court for contempt and upon conviction, shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00), imprisoned not more than sixty (60) days, or both. Each day of violation is a separate offense.

The privilege of self-incrimination is not a defense for violating subsection (c) of this section nor shall a person be incriminated for providing testimony or evidence under subsection (c) of this section except for perjury committed during testimony.

The department of workforce services shall provide personnel necessary to administer this act in accordance with rules of the commission and determinations of the commission authorized by law. The commission shall not exercise supervisory authority over those personnel.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 11; 1939, ch. 124, § 15; 1941, ch. 96, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 54-111; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 27-33; Laws 1967, ch. 71, § 1; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-113; Laws 1979, ch. 141, § 1; 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, §§ 2, 3; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a)(i) and (f).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Civil rule superseded by regulations. —

The applicable statutes and regulations relating to actions against the department of employment supersede Rule 6(d), W.R.C.P. (additional time after service by mail). Fullmer v. Wyoming Employment Sec. Comm'n, 858 P.2d 1122,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1993).

Applied

in

Hupp v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 715 P.2d 223,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1986).

Stated

in

Scott v. Fagan, 684 P.2d 805,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1984).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Immunity and the Grand Jury,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 629 (1973).

§ 27-3-603.
Confidentiality of information.

Except as otherwise provided, information maintained pursuant to this act shall not be disclosed in a manner which reveals the identity of the employing unit or individual. The confidentiality limitations of this section do not apply to transfers of information between the divisions of the department of workforce services so long as the transfer of information is not restricted by federal law, rule or contract. Any employee who discloses information outside of the department in violation of federal or state law may be terminated without progressive discipline.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 11; 1939, ch. 124, § 15; 1941, ch. 96, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 54-111; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 27-33; Laws 1967, ch. 71, § 1; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-113; Laws 1979, ch. 141, § 1; 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1993, ch. 23, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Game warden can obtain unemployment insurance records. —

A game warden who complies with the strict requirements of obtaining a search warrant from a judge or a court commissioner can obtain confidential records of the division of unemployment insurance. Wyoming Dep't of Employment, Div. of Unemployment Ins. v. Patrick, 818 P.2d 54,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 27-3-604.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws, 1937, ch. 113, §§ 10 and 11, related to the executive director of the employment security commission, and additional personnel.

§ 27-3-605.
Responsibilities of department of workforce services.

The department of workforce services shall administer the unemployment compensation program in this state.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 4.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, §§ 10, 12; 1939, ch. 124, § 16; 1941, ch. 96, §§ 9, 11; 1943, ch. 58, § 7; 1945, ch. 81, § 9; C.S. 1945, §§ 54-110, 54-112; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 10; 1953, ch. 118, § 1; 1957, ch. 226, § 4; W.S. 1957, §§ 27-32, 27-34; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 40; 1963, ch. 46, § 2; 1965, ch. 115, § 41; 1967, ch. 181, § 21; 1969, ch. 168, § 18; W.S. 1977, §§ 27-3-112, 27-3-114; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 4; 2005, ch. 186, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “shall administer the unemployment compensation program in this state” for “is the successor agency to the Wyoming state employment service division and the unemployment compensation division which previously existed under the commission. The department shall perform all functions previously performed by those divisions.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a).

§ 27-3-606.
Department duties regarding unemployment and reemployment.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 4, § 3.

The department shall take appropriate steps to:

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 186, § 3.

Conduct and publish results of investigations and research studies.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 11; 1939, ch. 124, § 15; 1941, ch. 96, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 54-111; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 27-33; Laws 1967, ch. 71, § 1; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-113; Laws 1979, ch. 141, § 1; 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1996, ch. 4, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 186, § 3.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, repealed former (c)(i) through (c)(iv), which provided that the duties of the department were to (1) reduce and prevent unemployment; (2) encourage and assist in the adoption of practical methods of vocational training, retraining and guidance; (3) investigate, recommend, advise and assist in the establishment and operation of public works reserves by the state and its political subdivisions to be used during business depression and unemployment; and (4) promote alternative reemployment of unemployed workers.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-607.
Cooperation by department with federal, state and local agencies; disclosure and submission of specified information; limitations.

The department shall:

Cooperate with and report to the federal government pursuant to requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 902 et seq. and comply with federal regulations governing expenditures of funds paid to the state under 42 U.S.C. § 501 et seq.;

Furnish upon request of any federal agency administering public works programs or public employment assistance, the name, address, ordinary occupation and employment status of benefit recipients and their right to future benefits under this act;

Upon request, pursuant to contract and on a reimbursable basis, of any state or political subdivision, furnish wage information obtained pursuant to this act determined necessary by regulation of the United States health and human services department for determining eligibility or assistance under 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.;

Upon request, pursuant to contract and on a reimbursable basis, disclose to officers or employees of any state or local child support enforcement agency operating pursuant to a plan described under 42 U.S.C. § 654 or to the federal parent locater service, any wage or unemployment compensation claim information obtained under this act for an identified individual;

Upon request, pursuant to contract and on a reimbursable basis, disclose to officers and employees of the United States department of agriculture and any state supplemental nutrition assistance program agency defined under 7 U.S.C. § 2012(n)(1), any wage information obtained under this act for an identified individual, any record of application for or receipt of benefits and the amount received, his most recent home address and any refusal of an offer of employment and a description of this employment;

Upon request, pursuant to contract and on a reimbursable basis, provide unemployment insurance benefit and wage information to the department of housing and urban development and to other public housing agencies. Such information shall be provided as required by the McKinney Homeless Act of 1988, section 904(c) and in a manner as prescribed by the secretary of labor;

Disclose information contained in its records to the United States secretary of health and human services or his designee, as necessary for the purposes of the national directory of new hires established under section 453 of the Social Security Act. The requesting agency shall reimburse the department for the cost of furnishing this information. The department shall work in conjunction with other states to ensure that adequate safeguards exist at the federal level so that state information being provided under this section is not disclosed for any purpose, except as authorized by law;

Upon request, pursuant to contract and on a reimbursable basis, disclose and furnish copies of records relating to the administration of this act to the railroad retirement board;

Require any recipient of information disclosed under this subsection to comply with any safeguards necessary and specified in federal law to ensure that the information furnished shall be used only for the purposes authorized.

A requesting agency shall agree that information obtained under paragraph (a)(iv) of this section be used only for establishing and collecting child support obligations from and locating individuals owing obligations enforced pursuant to a plan described under 42 U.S.C. § 654, and that information obtained under paragraph (a)(v) of this section be used only for determining the applicant’s eligibility for benefits or the amount of benefits under the supplemental nutrition assistance program. The agency shall also reimburse the department for the cost of furnishing this information. Requirements for confidentiality of information under this act and the penalties for improper disclosure apply to the use of this information by officers and employees of any child support or supplemental nutrition assistance program agency and the United States department of agriculture.

The department may, on a reimbursable basis unless otherwise provided:

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 186, § 3.

Notwithstanding W.S.

27-3-603

and subject to regulations of the commission and pursuant to contract, disclose necessary information obtained from any employing unit or individual under this act and any determination of benefit rights to any state or federal agency administering Wagner-Peyser Act or federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or subsequent similar enactments training services;

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 186, § 3.

Cooperate with any federal agency administering any unemployment compensation law;

Allow access to information obtained pursuant to the administration of this act to the division of criminal investigation of the attorney general’s office, upon a written request by the director which demonstrates there is a reasonable basis to believe the health or safety of a person is in danger and the information may lead to the elimination of that danger;

Allow the state auditor’s office and the division of worker’s compensation access to certain information obtained under this act limited to the name, address, social security identification number and other general information pertaining to benefit entitlement and employers. Disclosure of information under this paragraph is for purposes of comparing information of the department with that of a requesting state agency for the detection of improper or fraudulent claims or the determination of potential tax liability, for employer compliance with notification, registration, certification or qualification requirements or for the collection of amounts owed the department;

Upon request, disclose information not otherwise restricted by law or contract to the bureau of labor statistics;

Upon written request, disclose any information obtained under this act to director or agency head, or his designee or agent, in the executive branch of federal or state government to be used by the public official only for official business in connection with the administration of a law or in the enforcement of a law by that public official. The requesting agency shall reimburse the department for the cost of furnishing this information unless the cost is insignificant;

Inform a project owner or contractor if his prime contractor or any subcontractor has notified the department and whether or not the prime contractor or any subcontractor is in compliance with this act;

Pursuant to contract, disclose wage information on a nonreimbursable basis to the social security administration utilizing the unemployment insurance interstate inquiry system;

Require any recipient of information disclosed under this subsection to comply with any safeguards necessary as specified in federal regulation to ensure that the information furnished shall be used only for the purposes authorized;

Notwithstanding W.S.

27-3-603

and subject to regulations of the commission, disclose necessary information obtained from any employing unit or individual under this act and any determination of benefit rights to any state or federal agency administering unemployment compensation laws or federal tax laws and to the office of the United States bankruptcy trustee.

The department may conduct and publish statistical analysis of payroll and employment of state agencies in the executive branch and of school districts, which may reveal the identity of state agency and school district employing units.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 11; 1939, ch. 124, § 15; 1941, ch. 96, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 54-111; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 27-33; Laws 1967, ch. 71, § 1; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-113; Laws 1979, ch. 141, § 1; 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1984, ch. 50, § 2; 1985, ch. 129, § 1; 1986, ch. 56, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 83, § 1; 1993, ch. 19, § 1; 1995, ch. 13, § 1; ch. 121, § 2; 1997, ch. 91, § 2; 1998, ch. 6, § 3; ch. 55, § 1; 2005, ch. 186, §§ 2, 3; 2010, ch. 66, § 1; 2012, ch. 101, § 1; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 40, § 1, effective March 4, 2016.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “pursuant to contract and on a reimbursable basis” or a variant in (a)(iii) through (a)(vi); added (a)(viii), whose provisions were formerly contained in (c)(i); redesignated former (a)(viii) as (a)(ix); in the introductory language in (c), inserted “on a reimbursable basis unless otherwise provided”; repealed former (c)(i), pertaining to disclosure to the railroad retirement board; in (c)(ii), inserted “and pursuant to contract,” substituted “necessary information” for “information,” and substituted “Wagner-Peyser Act or Workforce Investment Act training services” for “public employment services, unemployment compensation laws or federal tax laws and to the office of the United States bankruptcy trustee”; repealed former (c)(iii), whose provisions were obsolete; rewrote (c)(vii), deleting provisions pertaining to officers and employees of the industrial siting administration and the Wyoming business council for economic development forecasting and economic development analysis; substituted “written request” for “request” in (c)(viii); added (c)(x) through (c)(xii); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (d).

The 2012 amendment,

in (d), inserted “and of school districts” and “and school district.”

Laws 2012, ch. 101 § 8, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “supplemental nutrition assistance program” for “food stamp” once in (a)(v) and twice in (b).

The 2016 amendment

, substituted “federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or subsequent similar enactments” for “Workforce Investment Act” in (c)(ii).

Laws 2016, ch. 40 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

The McKinney Homeless Act of 1988, as amended, is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 11301 et seq. The Wagner-Peyser Act is codified as 29 U.S.C. 49 et seq. The Workforce Investment Act is codified as 29 U.S.C. 2801 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Applied

in

Wyoming Dep't of Emp. v. Patrick, 818 P.2d 54,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 27-3-608.
Agreements by department with other states, federal government and foreign governments authorized.

Notwithstanding W.S.

27-3-104

through

27-3-108

, the department may enter into arrangements with other states for services performed by an individual ordinarily performing services in more than one (1) state for a single employing unit. Subject to election by the employing unit and approval of the affected states, the arrangement may specify that service is performed entirely within the state in which:

Any part of the individual’s services are performed;

The employing unit maintains its principal place of business; or

The individual has his residence.

The department is also authorized to enter into agreements with other states or the federal government for wages or services entitled to benefits under the law of another state or the federal government to be wages for insured work under this act or under the law of another state or the federal government. The department shall participate in arrangements approved by the United States secretary of labor for the payment of compensation by combining an individual’s wages and employment covered under this act with those covered under the laws of other states which assure the prompt and full payment of compensation, apply the base period of a single state law to a claim involving the combination of wages and employment covered under two (2) or more state laws and avoid duplication of wages and employment. No arrangement under this subsection shall be entered into unless the participating state or federal agency agrees to reimburse the fund for the amount of benefits paid under this act for wages or services the department finds fair and reasonable. The department shall reimburse to other state or federal agencies a reasonable portion of benefits paid under their law.

The department may make and receive reimbursements from or to the fund in accordance with arrangements pursuant to this section. For purposes of this act, reimbursements payable are benefits.

To the extent authorized by federal law and constitution and agreements entered into between the federal government and foreign governments, the department may enter into or cooperate in agreements for facilities and services provided by a foreign government for use in receiving claims and paying benefits under this act or similar law of the foreign government.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 18; 1939, ch. 124, § 19; C.S. 1945, § 54-118; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 27-39; Laws 1971, ch. 53, § 1; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-119; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-609.
Legal representation in civil and criminal actions.

In any civil action to enforce this act, the department may be represented by a qualified attorney employed by the department or by the attorney general at the request of the department.

All criminal actions for violation of this act or any rules or regulations issued pursuant to this act shall be prosecuted by the attorney general or at his request and under his direction, by the district attorney for the county in which the prosecution is brought.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 17; C.S. 1945, § 54-117; W.S. 1957, § 27-38; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-118; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-610.
Establishment of fee schedule and payment for certain services.

The department may charge a fee and require payment to recover the cost of services for photocopying, preparation of forms or other material in responding to inquiries to provide information not confidential by law, furnishing publications prepared by the department and any other services rendered by the department which are not directly related to the administration of this act. Such fees shall be deposited into the employment security administration account.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 222, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-611.
Maintenance of records by department; procedures.

The department may maintain any or all of its records on a computer imaging system that maintains true and accurate copies or images of original documents. The department may destroy original documents after putting the documents in the computer imaging system. True and accurate copies generated by the computer imaging system shall be admissible in court or administrative hearings under the same conditions as the original document would be admissible.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 73, § 1.